South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3947.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Continuing education requirements for nonresident brokers and associates SECTION 1.    Section 40-57-340(B)(1) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (1) Exempt from the biennial continuing education required by subsection (A) are: (a) an associate who successfully completes a post-licensing course or takes a broker course is exempt for the renewal period during which the course was taken; (b) a licensee while on inactive status; (c) a broker or associate with twenty-five years or more of licensure in South Carolina who is sixty-five years of age or more may apply for an age and experience-based full continuing education waiver, and upon granting of the waiver, is exempt from the continuing education requirements of this chapter; (d) a broker or associate with a minimum of twenty-five years of licensure in South Carolina who may apply to be granted an experience-based partial continuing education waiver, and upon granting of the waiver, is required to complete only a mandatory four-hour core course biennially to maintain active licensure; or (e) a nonresident broker or a nonresident associate who has successfully satisfied the continuing education requirements of their jurisdiction of residence may be exempt with approval of the commission. Expired license renewals, fees, continuing education exemption SECTION 2.    Chapter 57, Title 40 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 40-57-345. An individual with an expired license who, at the time of expiration, was in good standing, has twenty-five years or more of licensure in South Carolina, and who is sixty-five years of age, may apply to the Real Estate Commission for a renewal of the expired license. The applicant must pay the renewal fee as provided by law. Upon renewal, the licensee is exempt from continuing education requirements as provided by law. Time effective SECTION 3.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 6th day of May, 2025. Approved the 8th day of May, 2025. __________